District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0402.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Improving School Attendance Outcomes Amendment Act of 2025.”
Sec. 2. An Act To provide for compulsory school attendance, for the taking of a school
census in the District of Columbia, and for other purposes, approved February 4, 1925 (43 Stat.
806; D.C. Official Code § 38-208) is amended as follows:
(a) Section 6 of Article II (D.C. Official Code §38-208) is amended by repealing
subsection (c).
(b) Section 7(b) of Article II (D.C. Official Code §38-208) is amended to read as follows:


“(b) For minor students age 5 and older, within 3 days of the 5th unexcused full school
day absence, the educational institution shall notify the Office of the State Superintendent of
Education which shall provide the parent with the truancy prevention resource guide created
pursuant to § 38-2602(b)(19); provided, that the parent has not received the truancy prevention
resource guide before the 5th unexcused absence.”
(c) Section 7(c) of Article II (D.C. Official Code §38-208) is amended by adding new
subparagraphs (D-F) to read as follows:
“(D) For minor students age 5 and older, beginning in the 2026-2027 school year,
within 3 days of the 10th unexcused full day absence, the educational institution shall notify the
Office of the Attorney General Juvenile Division which shall send the minor student and their
caregiver a letter advising that the minor student is at risk of violating the school attendance
requirements under District law and may be subject to prosecution upon 15 unexcused full
school day absences.
“(E) After an educational institution has referred a minor student 5 years of age
through 13 years of age to the Child and Family Services Agency, if the Child and Family
Services Agency concludes there is not sufficient information to sustain an allegation of
educational neglect, the Child and Family Services Agency shall, within 3 days after its
conclusion, refer the matter to the Department of Human Services. Beginning with the 2026-2027
school year, the Department of Human Services shall, within 3 days after receiving a referral
from the Child and Family Services Agency, make an effort to contact the child’s parent or
guardian to identify challenges disrupting regular school attendance and may provide appropriate
social services for the support of school attendance outcomes.
“(F) Not later than August 31, 2027, The Child and Family Services Agency and


Department of Human Services shall co-publish and deliver to the Council a report with the total
number of educational neglect reports referred to the Department of Human Services by the
Child and Family Services Agency and the outcomes of referrals, including number and type of
social services offered and provided and attendance outcomes.”
(d) A new Section 9 is added to read as follows:
“Section 9. Unified Absenteeism Reporting
“Not later than March 31, 2028, the Deputy Mayor for Education shall create a plan for a
unified absenteeism referral system, including D.C. Code revisions necessary for unification.
This unified absenteeism referral system shall refer all age groups to the Department of Human
Services, who, in collaboration with the Child and Family Services Agency, shall provide
appropriate social services for the support of school attendance outcomes.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.